District of Columbia statutes.
2-1910

Visual recording.

In any proceeding involving a hearing-impaired person, an appointing authority, on the appointing authority’s own motion or on the motion of a party to the proceedings, may order that an electronic, visual recording of the testimony of the hearing-impaired person and its interpretation be made for use in verification of the official transcript of the proceedings.

Jan. 28, 1988, D.C. Law 7-62, § 11, 34 DCR 7426
1981 Ed., § 31-2710.